Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-209.02
Officers and employees; merger of offices; salaries.

The local governing body of a village may by ordinance combine and merge any elective or appointive office or employment or any combination of duties of any such offices or employments, except trustee, with any other elective or appointive office or employment so that one or more of such offices or employments or any combination of duties of any such offices or employments may be held by the same officer or employee at the same time, except that trustees may perform and upon board approval receive compensation for seasonal or emergency work subject to sections 49-14,103.01 to 49-14,103.06. The offices or employments so merged and combined shall always be construed to be separate and the effect of the combination or merger shall be limited to a consolidation of official duties only. The salary or compensation of the officer or employee holding the merged and combined offices or employments or offices and employments shall not be in excess of the maximum amount provided by law for the salary or compensation of the office, offices, employment, or employments so merged and combined. For purposes of this section, volunteer firefighters and ambulance drivers shall not be considered officers.

Laws 1945, c. 25, § 2, p. 135;

R.S.Supp.,1945, § 17-209.01;

Laws 1972, LB 1032, § 106;

Laws 1984, LB 368, § 3;

Laws 1984, LB 682, § 8;

Laws 1986, LB 548, § 9;

Laws 1990, LB 756, § 3.